Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5927.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 173. (1) The commission shall establish a distributed generation program by order issued by July 19, 2017. The commission may promulgate rules the commission considers necessary to implement this program. Any rules adopted regarding time limits for approval of parallel operation must recognize grid reliability and safety complications including those arising from equipment saturation, use of multiple technologies, and proximity to synchronous motor loads. The program must apply to all electric utilities whose rates are regulated by the commission and alternative electric suppliers in this state. Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 173a, the distributed generation program does not apply to an eligible rooftop solar generator and any energy produced through the rooftop solar generator that participates in the rooftop solar net metering program established in section 173a. Not later than 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 173a, the commission shall issue an order and promulgate rules, as necessary, to update the distributed generation program to comply with the requirements of this subsection and section 173a. (2) Except as otherwise provided under this part, an electric customer of any class is eligible to interconnect an eligible electric generator with the customer's local electric utility and operate the eligible electric generator in parallel with the distribution system. The program must limit each customer to generation capacity designed to meet up to 110% of the customer's electricity consumption for the previous 12 months. The commission may waive the application, interconnection, and installation requirements of this part for customers participating in the net metering program under the commission's March 29, 2005 order in case no. U-14346. (3) An electric utility or alternative electric supplier is not required to allow for a distributed generation program that is greater than 10% of its average in-state peak load for the preceding 5 calendar years. The electric utility or alternative electric supplier shall notify the commission if its distributed generation program reaches the 10% limit under this subsection. The 10% limit under this subsection shall must be allocated as follows: (a) Not less than 50% for customers with an eligible electric generator capable of generating 20 kilowatts or less. (b) Not more than 50% for customers with an eligible electric generator capable of generating more than 20 kilowatts but not more than 550 kilowatts. (4) Selection of customers for participation in the distributed generation program must be based on the order in which the applications for participation in the program are received by the electric utility or alternative electric supplier. (5) An electric utility or alternative electric supplier shall not discontinue or refuse to provide electric service to a customer solely because the customer participates in the distributed generation program. An electric utility or alternative electric supplier shall not limit the rate schedule under which a customer is served solely because the customer participates in the distributed generation program. (6) The distributed generation program created under subsection (1) must include all of the following: (a) Statewide uniform interconnection requirements for all eligible electric generators. The interconnection requirements must be designed to protect electric utility workers and equipment and the general public. (b) Distributed generation equipment and its installation shall must meet all current local and state electric and construction code requirements. Distributed generation equipment does not include rooftop solar equipment that is installed as part of an eligible rooftop solar generator that participates in the rooftop solar net metering program under section 173a. Any equipment that is certified by a nationally recognized testing laboratory to IEEE 1547.1-2020 testing standards and in compliance with UL 1741 scope 1.1A and installed in compliance with this part is considered to be compliant. The commission may adopt successor requirements by promulgating rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, if the commission determines the successor requirements are reasonable and consistent with the purposes of this subdivision. Within the time provided by the commission in rules promulgated under subsection (1) and consistent with good utility practice, and the protection of electric utility workers, electric utility equipment, and the general public, an electric utility may study, confirm, and ensure that an eligible electric generator installation at the customer's site meets the IEEE 1547.1-2020 requirements or any applicable successor requirements adopted by the commission. If necessary to promote grid reliability or safety, the commission may promulgate rules that require the use of inverters that perform specific automated grid-balancing functions to integrate distributed generation onto the electric grid. Inverters that interconnect distributed generation resources may be owned and operated by electric utilities. Both of the following must be completed before the equipment is operated in parallel with the distribution system of the utility: (i) Utility testing and approval of the interconnection, including all metering. (ii) Execution of a parallel operating agreement. (c) A uniform application form and process to be used by all electric utilities and alternative electric suppliers in this state. Customers who that are served by an alternative electric supplier shall submit a copy of the application to the electric utility for the customer's service area. (d) Distributed generation customers shall pay the retail rates for electricity inflow under the rate schedule under which the customer is served. (7) Distributed generation customers shall receive a monthly bill credit for outflow as determined by the commission. Credits for outflow must reflect cost of service. (8) Each electric utility and alternative electric supplier shall maintain records of all applications and up-to-date records of all active eligible electric generators located within their service area. (9) As used in this section, "rooftop solar equipment" means photovoltaic modules, mounting or racking systems, wiring, inverters, meters, and associated equipment that meet the following requirements: (a) Are located on a customer's premises. (b) Are interconnected on the customer side of a meter. (c) Are primarily intended to offset all or part of the customer's on-site electric load, including equipment installed on a roof, canopy, parking structure, or other on-site structure or improvement. Sec. 173a. (1) The purpose and goals of this section are to establish minimum, uniform statewide consumer protections for rooftop solar net metering. (2) Not later than 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the commission shall establish by order a rooftop solar net metering program that applies to electric utilities and alternative electric suppliers. (3) The commission shall not approve a tariff, rule, or rooftop solar net metering program provision that is inconsistent with this section. The rooftop solar net metering program must include all of the following: (a) Monthly netting. For each billing period, an electric utility and alternative electric supplier shall calculate net metering by subtracting total kilowatt hours supplied to the eligible customer from total kilowatt hours generated by the eligible rooftop solar generator and exported to the distribution system. (b) Full retail credit for exports. For each kilowatt-hour exported to the distribution system by an eligible rooftop solar generator, the eligible customer must receive a bill credit at the full retail rate applicable to that customer for that billing period. The full retail rate must include all per-kilowatt-hour charges, riders, and factors, including power supply cost recovery factors, transmission, and distribution charges, but does not include taxes. (c) Carryforward and annual payout. Net excess generation credits must carry forward for not less than 12 consecutive billing periods. At the end of the twelfth billing period after a net excess generation credit is first earned, the remaining net excess generation credits must be paid to the eligible customer at the full retail rate applicable to that customer for the billing period in which the annual true-up occurs. (d) No punitive charges. An electric utility shall not impose a standby charge, demand charge, minimum bill, additional fixed charge, interconnection fee, insurance requirement, or other charge on an eligible customer solely because the customer participates in the rooftop solar net metering program, except for a reasonable, cost-based, 1-time interconnection application fee approved by the commission. An interconnection application fee must be uniformly applied to all applications and must not discourage participation. (e) System sizing. The commission shall allow an eligible customer to install an eligible rooftop solar generator sized to meet up to 120% of the customer's electricity consumption for the previous 12 months, measured in kilowatt hours. For a customer without 12 months of usage history, the commission shall establish reasonable default methods based on expected usage. (f) Interconnection and approval timelines. The rooftop solar net metering program must provide statewide uniform interconnection requirements for eligible rooftop solar generators and must include all of the following: (i) A uniform application and process used by all electric utilities and alternative electric suppliers. (ii) A uniform timeline for application approval that must include the following: (A) For an application for an eligible rooftop solar generator with a nameplate capacity of 25 kilowatts alternating current or less, the electric utility shall approve or deny a complete application not later than 10 business days after the application is received. (B) For an application for an eligible rooftop solar generator with a nameplate capacity greater than 25 kilowatts alternating current, the electric utility shall approve or deny a complete application not later than 20 business days after the application is received. (C) For a complete application that is not approved or denied within the time periods described in sub-subparagraph (A) or (B), the application is considered approved, and the electric utility shall proceed to meter installation and permission to operate. (g) System impact study, if applicable. If an electric utility determines that a system impact study is necessary, the electric utility shall provide a written justification and a cost estimate. The commission shall ensure that the system impact study costs and any required distribution upgrades are allocated consistent with cost causation and shall prohibit the allocation of system-wide upgrades to the eligible customer unless the upgrade is uniquely and directly caused by the interconnection of that customer's eligible rooftop solar generator. (h) Minimum program availability. The commission shall ensure that each electric utility offers rooftop solar net metering to eligible customers until the aggregate enrolled capacity of eligible rooftop solar generators in that electric utility's service territory reaches at least 20% of the electric utility's average in-state peak load for the preceding 5 calendar years. The commission shall not authorize the suspension of enrollment, including through a tariff, order, or rate case, before the 20% threshold is met. (i) Grandfathering and nonrollback protections. The commission shall require that the crediting method and rate applicable to an eligible customer under subdivision (a) are fixed for a period of 20 years beginning on the date the electric utility grants permission to operate for that eligible customer's eligible rooftop solar generator. A subsequent commission order, rule, tariff, or rate case does not reduce or impair those credits during the 20-year period. (j) Transparency and reporting. The rooftop solar net metering program must include both of the following: (i) Each electric utility shall maintain a publicly accessible online dashboard that, at a minimum, reports the number of applications received, applications approved, applications denied with stated reasons, average processing time, and total enrolled rooftop solar capacity. The dashboard must be updated at least monthly. (ii) Not later than March 1 each year, the commission shall submit a report to the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary jurisdiction over energy policy describing program participation, interconnection timelines, costs and benefits, and any recommended statutory changes. (k) Benefit-cost accounting. The commission shall require that any evaluation of costs and benefits of rooftop solar net metering include, at a minimum, avoided energy costs, avoided capacity costs, avoided transmission and distribution investments, reduced line losses, resiliency and reliability benefits, and environmental compliance benefits. The commission shall not approve a methodology that double counts fixed costs or assigns fixed costs to rooftop solar net metering program participants in a manner that would result in program participants paying for the same cost more than once. (4) The commission shall promulgate rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to implement this section. The rules must include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Coordination with alternative electric suppliers to ensure that customers served by alternative electric suppliers are able to participate in rooftop solar net metering and receive the credits required under subsection (3)(a). The rules promulgated under this subdivision must include rules for billing and credit reconciliation between the alternative electric supplier and the electric utility that serves the distribution system. (b) Consumer protections that require clear, plain-language disclosures to customers regarding interconnection timelines, billing credits, and complaint processes, and establish an expedited complaint process for disputes under this section. (5) An electric utility or alternative electric supplier that does not meet the interconnection and approval timelines provided for under subsection (3)(f) is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 per day per violation. Each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate violation. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Eligible customer" means a customer of any class that receives retail electric service from an electric utility or alternative electric supplier in this state. (b) "Eligible rooftop solar generator" means a solar photovoltaic electric generation facility and associated rooftop solar equipment that is located on an eligible customer's premises, interconnected on the customer side of the meter, and designed primarily to offset on-site electric load. (c) "Net metering" means measuring the difference, in kilowatt hours, between the electricity supplied to an eligible customer by the electric utility and the electricity generated by an eligible rooftop solar generator and delivered to the electric utility's distribution system. (d) "Net excess generation" means, during a billing period, the number of kilowatt hours exported to the distribution system by an eligible rooftop solar generator that exceeds the number of kilowatt hours supplied to the eligible customer during that billing period.